Hawaii statutes.
187A-6.5 Release and confiscation of
harmful aquatic life. (a) No person shall release any live non-native
fish or other live non-native aquatic life being held in an aquarium or other
confinement for scientific study, exhibition, display, sale, or for any other
purpose, into any waters of the State, except as provided in section 187A-2(4).

(b) The department or its agents may seize,
confiscate, or destroy, as a public nuisance, any fish or other aquatic life
found in any waters of the State and whose importation is prohibited or
restricted pursuant to rules of the department of agriculture. [L 1993, c 256,
§1; am L 1999, c 195, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next